District of Columbia statutes.
34-216

“Street railroad” defined.

The term “street railroad” when used in this subtitle includes every such railroad, whether wholly or partly in the District of Columbia, by whatsoever power operated, or any extension or extensions, branch or branches thereof, for public use in the conveyance of persons or property for compensation, and includes all equipment, construction, maintenance, repairs, switches, spurs, tracks, terminals, terminal facilities of every kind, trackage, joint or reciprocal trackage, transfers of passengers between street railways having connecting lines and street railways having independent lines, subways, tunnels, and stations, used, operated, or owned by or in connection with any such street railroad, and all the property of the same used in the conduct of its business.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 974, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1

History

1981 Ed., § 43-209.
1973 Ed., § 43-109.

Prior Codifications